Washington statutes.
RCW 9.41.171

Alien possession of firearms—Requirements—Penalty.

It is a class C felony for any person who is not a citizen of the United States to carry or possess any firearm, unless the person: (1) Is a lawful permanent resident; (2) has obtained a valid alien firearm license pursuant to RCW 9.41.173; (3) is a deferred action for childhood arrivals recipient lawfully employed as a peace officer as defined in RCW 10.120.010 or a corrections officer as defined in RCW 43.101.010; or (4) meets the requirements of RCW 9.41.175.

[ 2024 c 330 s 4; 2009 c 216 s 2.]